Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.410

Address change within county—Deadlines. (Effective until June 1, 2025.)

A registered voter who changes his or her residence from one address to another within the same county may transfer his or her registration to the new address in one of the following ways:

(1) Sending the county auditor a request stating both the voter's present address and the address from which the voter was last registered received by an election official eight days prior to a primary or election;

(2) Appearing in person before the county auditor, or at a voting center or other location designated by the county auditor, and making such a request up until 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or election;

(3) Telephoning or emailing the county auditor to transfer the registration by eight days prior to a primary or election;

(4) Submitting a voter registration application received by an election official by eight days prior to a primary or election;

(5) Submitting information to the department of licensing and received by an election official by eight days prior to a primary or election;

(6) Submitting voter registration information through the health benefit exchange and received by an election official by eight days prior to a primary or election; or

(7) Submitting information to an agency designated under RCW 29A.08.365 and received by an election official by eight days prior to a primary or election once automatic voter registration is implemented at the agency.

[ 2019 c 391 s 7. Prior: 2018 c 112 s 3; 2018 c 110 s 204; 2009 c 369 s 22; 2003 c 111 s 228; 1994 c 57 s 35; 1991 c 81 s 23; 1975 1st ex.s. c 184 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 24; 1965 c 9 s 29.10.020; prior: 1955 c 181 s 4; prior: 1933 c 1 s 14, part; RRS s 5114-14, part; prior: 1919 c 163 s 9, part; 1915 c 16 s 9, part; 1889 p 417 s 12, part; RRS s 5129, part. Formerly RCW 29.10.020.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 112 ss 1-4: See note following RCW 29A.08.140.

Short title—Findings—Intent—2018 c 110: See notes following RCW 29A.08.355.

Severability—1994 c 57: See note following RCW 29A.16.040.

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 184: See note following RCW 29A.08.135.

PDFRCW 29A.08.410

Address change—Deadlines. (Effective June 1, 2025.)

A registered voter who changes residence from one address to another may transfer the voter's registration to the new address in one of the following ways:

(1) Sending the county auditor a request stating both the voter's present address and the address from which the voter was last registered received by an election official by the eighth day prior to a primary or election;

(2) Appearing in person before a county auditor, or at a voting center or other location designated by the county auditor, and making such a request up until 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or election;

(3) Telephoning or emailing the county auditor to update the voter's registration address by the eighth day prior to a primary or election;

(4) Submitting a voter registration application received by an election official by the eighth day prior to a primary or election;

(5) Submitting information to the department of licensing and received by an election official by the eighth day prior to a primary or election;

(6) Submitting voter registration information through the health benefit exchange and received by an election official by the eighth day prior to a primary or election; or

(7) Submitting information to an agency designated under RCW 29A.08.365 and received by an election official by the eighth day prior to a primary or election once automatic voter registration is implemented at the agency.

[ 2024 c 56 s 1; 2019 c 391 s 7. Prior: 2018 c 112 s 3; 2018 c 110 s 204; 2009 c 369 s 22; 2003 c 111 s 228; 1994 c 57 s 35; 1991 c 81 s 23; 1975 1st ex.s. c 184 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 24; 1965 c 9 s 29.10.020; prior: 1955 c 181 s 4; prior: 1933 c 1 s 14, part; RRS s 5114-14, part; prior: 1919 c 163 s 9, part; 1915 c 16 s 9, part; 1889 p 417 s 12, part; RRS s 5129, part. Formerly RCW 29.10.020.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 56: "This act takes effect June 1, 2025." [ 2024 c 56 s 5.]

Effective date—2018 c 112 ss 1-4: See note following RCW 29A.08.140.

Short title—Findings—Intent—2018 c 110: See notes following RCW 29A.08.355.

Severability—1994 c 57: See note following RCW 29A.16.040.

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 184: See note following RCW 29A.08.135.